Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202621-1729
Place of business.

(1) A credit union may change its principal place of business within this state upon written notice to, and approval by, the director. The written notice may be delivered to the department in person or sent by regular or electronic mail.

(2) A credit union may maintain automatic teller machines and point-of-sale terminals at locations other than its principal office pursuant to section 8-157.01.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 29;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 20;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 65.